Massachusetts, session 194th, H1444.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding at the end thereof the following new section:-
Section 46. The board of higher education shall have the authority to mandate that each
public higher education institution provide financial literacy counseling to accepted applicants of
the institution relative to student loans and other expenses to students upon arriving on campus.
The board is further authorized to provide a college financing plan developed by the federal
consumer financial protection bureau and the United States department of education to said
accepted applicants of the institution. College financing plans shall include the estimated cost of
attendance including tuition and fees, housing and meals, books and supplies, transportation and
other education costs as well as grants and scholarships and work-study and loan options. The
of 2

public institution of higher education may provide an electronic version of the college financing
plan in a printable format. The board of higher education may promulgate regulations to carry
out the purposes of this section.
of 2